Georgia statutes. 
(2) "Archeologist" means any person who is:

(A) A member of or meets the criteria for membership in the Society of Professional Archaeologists and can demonstrate experience in the excavation and interpretation of human graves; or

(B) Employed on July 1, 1991, by the state or by any county or municipal governing authority as an archeologist.

(3) "Burial ground" means an area dedicated to and used for interment of human remains. The term shall include privately owned burial plots, individually and collectively, once human remains have been buried therein. The fact that the area was used for burial purposes shall be evidence that it was set aside for burial purposes.

(4) "Burial object" means any item reasonably believed to have been intentionally placed with the human remains at the time of burial or interment or any memorial, tombstone, grave marker, or shrine which may have been added subsequent to interment. Such term also means any inscribed or uninscribed marker, coping, curbing, enclosure, fencing, pavement, shelter, wall, stoneware, pottery, or other grave object erected or deposited incident to or subsequent to interment.

(5) "Cemetery" or "cemeteries" means any land or structure in this state dedicated to and used for interment of human remains. It may be either a burial park for earth interments or a mausoleum for vault or crypt interments or a combination of one or more thereof.

(6) "Descendant" means a person or group of persons related to a deceased human by blood or adoption in accordance with Title 19.

(7) "Genealogist" means a person who traces or studies the descent of persons or families and prepares a probative record of such descent.

(8) "Human remains" means the bodies of deceased human beings in any stage of decomposition, including cremated remains.

(9) "Preserve and protect" means to keep safe from destruction, peril, or other adversity and may include the placement of signs, markers, fencing, or other such appropriate features so as to identify the site as a cemetery or burial ground and may also include the cleaning, maintenance, and upkeep of the site so as to aid in its preservation and protection.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2508, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1087, § 7/HB 910.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Georgia Cemeterians Board Act, § 43-8B-1 et seq.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Abandonment was a jury question. - Descendants of the grantor of a burial ground were not entitled to summary judgment on a buyer's claim that the cemetery was abandoned, O.C.G.A. § 36-72-2(1), because there was evidence that no one had been buried there since 1971, that the descendants had not paid taxes on the lot, and that the descendants had not maintained the cemetery. City of Sandy Springs v. Mills, 331 Ga. App. 709, 771 S.E.2d 405 (2015).

36-72-3. Authority of counties and municipalities to preserve abandoned cemeteries.

Statute text

Counties, anywhere within the county boundaries, and municipalities, anywhere within the municipal boundaries, are authorized, jointly and severally, to preserve and protect any abandoned cemetery or any burial ground which the county or municipality determines has been abandoned or is not being maintained by the person who is legally responsible for its upkeep, whether or not that person is financially capable of doing so, to expend public money in connection therewith, to provide for reimbursement of such funds by billing any legally responsible person or levying upon any of his property as authorized by local ordinance, and to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire any interest in land necessary for that purpose.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2508, § 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey article discussing local government law, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (1999).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Duty of county. - O.C.G.A. § 36-72-3 authorizes but does not compel a county to preserve and protect abandoned cemeteries. Smith v. Pulaski County, 269 Ga. 688, 501 S.E.2d 213 (1998).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Persons sentenced to community service may be utilized to assist counties or municipalities in the care of abandoned cemeteries or burial grounds. 1999 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U99-5.

36-72-4. Permit required for developing land on which cemetery located.

Statute text

No known cemetery, burial ground, human remains, or burial object shall be knowingly disturbed by the owner or occupier of the land on which the cemetery or burial ground is located for the purposes of developing or changing the use of any part of such land unless a permit is first obtained from the governing authority of the municipal corporation or county wherein the cemetery or burial ground is located, which shall have authority to permit such activity except as provided in Code Section 36-72-14.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Smith v. Pulaski County, 269 Ga. 688, 501 S.E.2d 213 (1998).

36-72-5. Application for permit.

Statute text

Application for a permit shall include, at a minimum, the following information:

(1) Evidence of ownership of the land on which the cemetery or burial ground is located in the form of a legal opinion based upon a title search;

(2) A report prepared by an archeologist stating the number of graves believed to be present and their locations as can be determined from the use of minimally invasive investigation techniques, including remote sensing methods and the use of metal probes, which activities shall not require a permit;

(3) A survey prepared by or under the direction of a registered surveyor showing the location and boundaries of the cemetery or burial ground based on an archeologist's report;

(4) A plan prepared by a genealogist for identifying and notifying the descendants of those buried or believed to be buried in such cemetery. If those buried or believed to be buried are of aboriginal or American Indian descent, the genealogist, in preparing the notification plan, shall consult with the Council on American Indian Concerns created pursuant to Code Section 44-12-280 and shall include in the notification plan not only any known descendants of those presumed buried but also any American Indian tribes as defined in paragraph (2) of Code Section 44-12-260 that are culturally affiliated; and

(5) A proposal for mitigation or avoidance of the effects of the planned activity on the cemetery or burial ground. If the proposal includes relocation of any human remains or burial objects, the proposal shall specify the method of disinterment, the location and method of disposition of the remains, the approximate cost of the process, and the approximate number of graves affected.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 5.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Relocation allowed. - Court properly found that the evidence showed no specific dedication of this property by any of the property's owners for use as a public cemetery and that the evidence did not suggest that the cemetery was used by the public at large as a burial place which supported the granting of the application for relocation. Hughes v. Cobb County, 264 Ga. 128, 441 S.E.2d 406 (1994).

36-72-6. Identification and notification of descendants of person in cemetery sought to be developed.

Statute text

The applicant shall implement its plan for identifying and locating descendants no later than the date the application is submitted to the governing authority. The governing authority shall review the applicant's plan for identifying and notifying the descendants of the deceased persons and may require as a condition for issuing a permit that the applicant implement additional reasonable attempts to identify and locate descendants. Notice to possible descendants shall include information on how to contact the governing authority and a summary of the rights of descendants under this chapter. The governing authority shall promptly inform any descendant who indicates an interest in the disposition of the human remains and burial objects regarding any proposals for mitigation, the terms of any permit issued, the time and place of any scheduled public hearings, and appeal procedures and events.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Hughes v. Cobb County, 264 Ga. 128, 441 S.E.2d 406 (1994).

36-72-7. Public hearing on development of abandoned cemetery; time for decision on application for permit.

Statute text

(a) Within 15 days after it is satisfied that all reasonable effort has been made to notify descendants, as provided in Code Section 36-72-6, and following receipt of the recommendations of a board or commission created pursuant to Code Section 36-72-9, the governing authority shall schedule a public hearing at which any interested party or citizen may appear and be given an opportunity to be heard. In addition to the notice required in Code Section 36-72-6, notice of the public hearing shall be advertised in the legal organ of the jurisdiction once a week for the two consecutive weeks immediately preceding the week in which any such hearing is held.

(b) Within 30 days after the conclusion of the public hearing, the governing authority shall notify the applicant in writing of its decision. The governing authority shall have the authority to deny the application with written reasons therefor, to issue a permit adopting the application in whole or in part, or to issue a permit which may include additional requirements to mitigate the proposed activity's adverse effects on the cemetery or burial ground, including but not limited to relocation of the proposed project, reservation of the cemetery or burial ground as an undeveloped area within the proposed development or use of land, and respectful disinterment and proper disposition of the human remains. The governing authority may adopt the applicant's proposal for mitigation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Consideration of alternatives. - Given that O.C.G.A. § 36-72-7 gives the governing authority the power to adopt the application in whole or in part, or to issue a permit which may include additional requirements, the board of commissioners had the authority to consider alternatives and to issue a permit for disinterment and relocation to the alternate site. Hughes v. Cobb County, 264 Ga. 128, 441 S.E.2d 406 (1994).

36-72-8. Issues considered in decision on application for permit.

Statute text

The governing authority shall consider the following in making its determination:

(1) The presumption in favor of leaving the cemetery or burial ground undisturbed;

(2) The concerns and comments of any descendants of those buried in the burial ground or cemetery and any other interested parties;

(3) The economic and other costs of mitigation;

(4) The adequacy of the applicant's plans for disinterment and proper disposition of any human remains or burial objects;

(5) The balancing of the applicant's interest in disinterment with the public's and any descendant's interest in the value of the undisturbed cultural and natural environment; and

(6) Any other compelling factors which the governing authority deems relevant.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Evidence supported relocation. - There was evidence in the record which supported the trial court's conclusion of fact that, due to lack of maintenance and inappropriate surroundings, relocation would preserve rather than destroy the cultural heritage of the county and the cemetery. Hughes v. Cobb County, 264 Ga. 128, 441 S.E.2d 406 (1994).

36-72-9. Establishment of board or commission to review applications in counties exceeding certain population size.

Statute text

The governing authority of any county whose population is in excess of 290,000 as established by the United States decennial census of 1980 or any such future census shall be authorized to establish or empower a new or existing commission or board to hear and review any application filed pursuant to Code Section 36-72-5. The board or commission shall conduct a public hearing within 60 days of the filing of an application and shall make a written recommendation to the governing authority no later than 15 days following the public hearing with respect to the sufficiency of the notice to descendants, the plan for mitigation, the disturbance and adverse effects on the cemetery or burial ground, the survey of the cemetery, and plans for disinterment and reinterment.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

36-72-10. Application fee.

Statute text

The governing authority shall be authorized to impose an application fee which shall reflect the cost to the governing authority for processing and reviewing the application including, but not limited to, the cost of hiring an attorney, independent archeologist, and independent surveyor to assist in making recommendations regarding the applicant's plan. Such fee, if imposed, shall not exceed $2,500.00.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

36-72-11. Appeal of decision on application for permit.

Statute text

Should any applicant or descendant be dissatisfied with a decision of the governing authority, he or she, within 30 days of such decision, may file an appeal in the superior court of the county in which the cemetery or burial ground is located in addition to the superior courts enumerated in Code Section 50-13-19.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Hughes v. Cobb County, 264 Ga. 128, 441 S.E.2d 406 (1994).

36-72-12. Development activities pending appeal.

Statute text

Until the expiration of the time for appeal as set forth in Code Section 36-72-11, the applicant shall not begin or resume activities which comply with the permit issued by the governing authority. If an appeal is filed, the applicant may begin or resume activities which comply with the permit only upon consent of the governing authority and the party seeking judicial review or upon order of the reviewing court for good cause shown.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

36-72-13. Inspection to ensure applicant's compliance.

Statute text

The governing authority or local law enforcement agency shall inspect as necessary to determine whether the applicant has complied with the provisions of this chapter requiring cessation or limitation of activity and with the terms of the permit as issued by the governing authority or as modified by the superior court or reviewing court.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

36-72-14. Jurisdiction of superior court; expending private or public funds to mitigate harm to cemetery.

Statute text

(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, when any agency, authority, or political subdivision of the state seeks to file an application for a permit under this chapter, the superior court having jurisdiction over the real property wherein the cemetery or burial ground is located shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the permit application. The superior court shall conduct its investigation and determination of the permit in accordance with Code Sections 36-72-6 through 36-72-8.

(b) When activities of an agency, authority, or political subdivision of the state adversely affect an abandoned cemetery or a burial ground, such agency, authority, or political subdivision shall bear the cost of mitigating the harm to the abandoned cemetery or burial ground or reinterring the human remains as a part of the cost of the project and is authorized to expend public funds for such purpose. When activities of a private person, corporation, or other private entity adversely affect an abandoned cemetery or a burial ground, such person, corporation, or other entity shall bear the cost of mitigating the harm to the cemetery or burial ground or reinterring the human remains. The cost of mitigating the harm to an abandoned cemetery or to a burial ground or reinterring the human remains exposed through vandalism by an unidentified vandal or through erosion may be borne by the governing authority in whose jurisdiction the abandoned cemetery or burial ground is located.

(c) The provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, the Department of Transportation shall not be required to obtain a permit under this chapter unless human remains are to be relocated; provided, however, that the department shall be required to obtain an archaeologist's report, pursuant to paragraph (2) of Code Section 36-72-5, confirming the absence of human remains on the affected property.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 11/HB 137.)

36-72-15. Disinterment and disposition of human remains or burial objects.

Statute text

Any disinterment and disposition of human remains or burial objects permitted under this chapter shall be supervised, monitored, or carried out by the applicant's archeologist and shall be done at the expense of the person or entity to whom the permit is issued.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

36-72-16. Penalties.

Statute text

Any person who knowingly fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction, shall pay a fine of not more than $5,000.00 for each grave site disturbed; provided, however, that any person who knowingly violates the provisions of Code Section 36-72-4 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction, shall be incarcerated for not more than six months and shall pay a fine not less than $5,000.00 for each grave site disturbed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-72-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 924, § 3.)

——————————

CHAPTER 73

CONTRACTS FOR REGIONAL FACILITIES

Sec.

36-73-1. Purpose.

36-73-2. Public hearing on proposed contract; notice.

36-73-3. Proposed facility located outside county or municipality; feasibility study.

36-73-4. Impingement upon powers, authority, rights, and duties of sheriffs prohibited.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1995, p. 699, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act applies with respect to contracts entered into on or after April 18, 1995, but shall not invalidate any contract entered into prior to April 18, 1995.

36-73-1. Purpose.

Statute text

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide certain conditions, limitations, and restrictions upon the exercise of the powers granted to counties and municipalities to enter into contracts for regional facilities under Article IX, Section IV, Paragraph IV of the Constitution.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-73-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 699, § 1.)

36-73-2. Public hearing on proposed contract; notice.

Statute text

A county or municipality which proposes to enter into a contract under Article IX, Section IV, Paragraph IV of the Constitution shall, prior to entering into such contract, conduct at least one public hearing with respect to such proposed contract. Notice of such public hearing shall be given by a prominent advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation within the county or municipality. The parties proposing to enter into a contract may agree to conduct a joint public hearing in lieu of separate public hearings by each party. The notice of public hearing required in the case of a municipality may be combined with a notice of public hearing for the county within which the municipality is located.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-73-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 699, § 1.)

36-73-3. Proposed facility located outside county or municipality; feasibility study.

Statute text

Where a county or municipality proposes to enter into a contract for a regional facility which will be located outside of such county or municipality and such contract will require the expenditure of public funds of the county or municipality, the county or municipality shall, prior to entering into the contract, conduct a financial feasibility study of the contract. Such study may be conducted by the county or municipality or the county or municipality may contract with another party for the conducting of the study. Two or more parties proposing to enter into a contract may conduct or contract for a joint financial feasibility study, but in this case the financial feasibility study shall separately address the fiscal concerns of each party to the proposed contract. A financial feasibility study shall at a minimum include a statement of the expected useful life of the regional project and a statement or projection of the costs and benefits to the county or municipality over the entire expected useful life of the project.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-73-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 699, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "study" was inserted near the end of the first sentence.

36-73-4. Impingement upon powers, authority, rights, and duties of sheriffs prohibited.

Statute text

No contract under Article IX, Section IV, Paragraph IV of the Constitution shall in any manner impinge upon the constitutional and statutory powers, authority, rights, and duties granted to the sheriffs of this state prior to the adoption of said Paragraph IV.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-73-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 699, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 74

LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE ENFORCEMENT BOARDS

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-74-1. Short title.

36-74-2. Legislative intent.

36-74-3. Creating or abolishing boards; hearings and fines.

Article 2

Enforcement Boards Created on or after January 1, 2003.

36-74-20. Application.

36-74-21. Definitions.

36-74-22. Membership of boards; requirements of members; chairperson; attorney's role.

36-74-23. Initiating of proceedings; time to correct violations; repeat violations; hearings.

36-74-24. Calling of hearings; hearing proceedings.

36-74-25. Powers of enforcement boards.

36-74-26. Administrative fines; public record.

36-74-27. Length of liens.

36-74-28. Appeals to superior court.

36-74-29. Notice required; form of notice.

36-74-30. Other enforcement methods; probable cause for investigation required.

Article 3

Enforcement Boards Created Prior to January 1, 2003.

36-74-40. Application of article.

36-74-41. Definitions.

36-74-42. Membership of boards; requirements of members; chairperson; attorney's role.

36-74-43. Initiating of proceedings; time to correct violations; repeat violations; hearings.

36-74-44. Calling of hearings; hearing proceedings; orders.

36-74-45. Powers of enforcement boards.

36-74-46. Administrative fines; public record.

36-74-47. Length of liens.

36-74-48. Appeals to superior court.

36-74-49. Notice required; form of notice.

36-74-50. Other enforcement methods.

Annotations

Cross references. - State building, plumbing, electrical, and other codes, § 8-2-20 et seq.

Building, electrical, and other codes, T. 36, C. 13.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Inferior Court Training and Assistance Act of 2000.'"

Law reviews. - For note on 2000 enactment of this article, see 17 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 52 (2000).

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-74-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Code Enforcement Boards Act" and is enacted to provide assistance to inferior courts with jurisdiction over county or municipal ordinances.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-2. Legislative intent.

Statute text

It is the intent of this chapter to promote, protect, and improve the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the counties and municipalities of this state by authorizing the creation of administrative boards with authority to impose administrative fines and other noncriminal penalties to provide an equitable, expeditious, effective, and inexpensive method of enforcing any codes and ordinances in force in counties and municipalities, where a pending or repeated violation continues to exist.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-3. Creating or abolishing boards; hearings and fines.

Statute text

(a) Each county or municipality may, at its option, create or abolish by ordinance local government code enforcement boards as provided in this chapter.

(b) A county or a municipality may, by ordinance, adopt an alternate code enforcement system which gives code enforcement boards the authority to hold hearings and assess fines against violators of the respective county or municipal codes and ordinances.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

——————————

ARTICLE 2

ENFORCEMENT BOARDS CREATED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2003

36-74-20. Application.

Statute text

The provisions of this article shall apply to enforcement boards created on or after January 1, 2003.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, "January" was substituted for "Jan.".

36-74-21. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Code enforcement officer" means any person contracted with or employed by a county or municipality who has enforcement authority for health, safety, or welfare requirements and is authorized to issue citations or file formal complaints regarding the same.

(2) "County or municipal codes and ordinances" means zoning ordinances and resolutions, ordinances and resolutions enacting subdivision regulations, environmental ordinances and resolutions, state minimum standard codes provided for in Code Section 8-2-25, ordinances and resolutions enacted pursuant to Code Section 8-2-25, other ordinances and resolutions regulating the development of real property, and ordinances and regulations providing for control of litter and debris, control of junked or abandoned vehicles, and control of overgrown vegetation. Notwithstanding the above, the term "county and municipal codes and ordinances" shall not include:

(A) Those codes and ordinances requiring a permit, unless the alleged violator has failed to secure all necessary valid permits under said codes and ordinances; or

(B) Any local amendments to the state minimum standard codes provided for in Code Section 8-2-25 that have not been adopted in conformity with the requirements of subsection (c) of Code Section 8-2-25.

(3) "Enforcement board" means a local government code enforcement board.

(4) "Local governing body" means the governing authority of the county or municipality, however designated.

(5) "Local governing body attorney" means the legal counselor for the county or municipality.

(6) "Violation involving the health or safety of a third party" means a violation that creates a legitimate concern for the health and safety of a third-party occupant of a dwelling place or that creates an immediate and substantial danger to the environment.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-21, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 1/HB 93.)

36-74-22. Membership of boards; requirements of members; chairperson; attorney's role.

Statute text

(a) The local governing body may appoint one or more code enforcement boards and legal counsel for the enforcement boards. The local governing body may appoint code enforcement boards consisting of three, five, or seven members. The local governing body may appoint up to two alternate members for each code enforcement board to serve on the board in the absence of board members.

(b) Members of the enforcement boards shall be residents of the municipality, in the case of municipal enforcement boards, or residents of the county, in the case of county enforcement boards. In making appointments to an enforcement board, the local governing body shall make good faith efforts to appoint one or more individuals who have experience or expertise relevant to one or more of the county or municipal codes that are within the subject matter jurisdiction of the respective enforcement board, including individuals with property management and litter control experience; provided, however, that the authority and jurisdiction of an enforcement board shall not in any way be limited due to the absence from its membership of one or more individuals with such experience or expertise.

(c) (1) The initial appointments to a seven-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) Three members appointed for a term of two years each; and

(B) Four members appointed for a term of four years each.

(2) The initial appointments to a five-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) Two members appointed for a term of two years each; and

(B) Three members appointed for a term of four years each.

(3) The initial appointments to a three-member code enforcement board shall be as follows:

(A) One member appointed for a term of two years; and

(B) Two members appointed for a term of four years each.

(4) Upon the expiration of the initial terms specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection all terms shall be for three years.

(5) The local governing body of a county or a municipality may reduce a seven-member code enforcement board to five members, or a five-member code enforcement board to three members, upon the simultaneous expiration of the terms of office of two members of the board.

(6) A member may be reappointed upon approval of the local governing body.

(7) An appointment to fill any vacancy on an enforcement board shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of office. If any member fails to attend two of three successive meetings without cause and without prior approval of the chairperson, the enforcement board shall declare the member's office vacant, and the local governing body shall promptly fill such vacancy.

(8) The members shall serve in accordance with ordinances of the local governing body and may be suspended and removed for cause as provided in such ordinances for removal of members of boards. A local governing body may, with or without cause, refuse to reappoint any member of an enforcement board at the expiration of his or her term of office.

(d) The members of an enforcement board shall elect a chairperson, who shall be a voting member, from among the members of the board. The presence of four or more members shall constitute a quorum of any seven-member enforcement board, the presence of three or more members shall constitute a quorum of any five-member enforcement board, and the presence of two or more members shall constitute a quorum of any three-member enforcement board. Members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for such travel, mileage, and per diem expenses as may be authorized by the local governing body or as otherwise provided by law.

(e) The local governing body attorney shall either be counsel to an enforcement board or shall represent the municipality or county by presenting cases before the enforcement board but in no case shall the local governing body attorney serve in both capacities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-22, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2.)

36-74-23. Initiating of proceedings; time to correct violations; repeat violations; hearings.

Statute text

(a) It shall be the duty of the code enforcement officer to initiate enforcement proceedings pursuant to the various codes; however, no member of a board shall have the power to initiate such enforcement proceedings.

(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, if a violation of any code or ordinance is found, the code enforcement officer shall notify the violator and give him or her a reasonable time to correct the violation. Should the violation continue beyond the time specified for correction, the code enforcement officer shall proceed with enforcement through the appropriate court or shall proceed with enforcement through the appropriate code enforcement board. If the code enforcement officer proceeds through a code enforcement board, the code enforcement officer shall notify an enforcement board and request a hearing. The code enforcement board shall schedule a hearing, and written notice of such hearing shall be hand delivered or made as provided in Code Section 36-74-29 to said violator. At the option of the code enforcement board, notice may additionally be served by publication or posting as provided in Code Section 36-74-29. If the violation is corrected and then recurs or if the violation is not corrected by the time specified for correction by the code enforcement officer, the case may be presented to the enforcement board even if the violation has been corrected prior to the board hearing, and the notice shall so state.

(c) If a repeat violation is found, the code enforcement officer shall notify the violator but is not required to give the violator a reasonable time to correct the violation. The code enforcement officer, upon notifying the violator of a repeat violation, shall notify an enforcement board and request a hearing. The code enforcement board shall schedule a hearing and shall provide written notice pursuant to Code Section 36-74-29. The case may be presented to the enforcement board even if the repeat violation has been corrected prior to the board hearing, and the notice shall so state.

(d) If the code enforcement officer has substantial reason to believe a violation presents a serious threat to the public health, safety, and welfare or if the violation is irreparable or irreversible in nature, the code enforcement officer shall make a reasonable effort to notify the violator and may immediately notify the enforcement board and request a hearing.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-23, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 2/HB 93.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Violations properly affirmed. - Regardless of whether the trial court erred in finding that the defendant committed repeat violations of operating illegal rooming houses in a city, the court's finding that the city did not have to afford the defendant with a pre-suit opportunity to correct the deficiencies under O.C.G.A. § 36-74-23(b) was affirmed on the alternative ground that the violations posed a serious threat to public health, safety, and welfare. Lewis v. City of Savannah, 336 Ga. App. 126, 784 S.E.2d 1 (2016).

36-74-24. Calling of hearings; hearing proceedings.

Statute text

(a) Upon request of the code enforcement officer, or at such other times as may be necessary, the chairperson of an enforcement board may call a hearing of an enforcement board; a hearing also may be called by written notice signed by at least three members of a seven-member enforcement board or signed by at least two members of a five-member enforcement board. Minutes shall be kept of all hearings by each enforcement board, and all hearings and proceedings shall be open to the public. The local governing body may provide or assign clerical and administrative personnel to assist the enforcement board in the proper performance of its duties.

(b) Each case before an enforcement board shall be presented by the local governing body attorney or by a code enforcement officer or other member of the administrative staff of the local governing body.

(c) An enforcement board shall proceed to hear the cases on the agenda for that day. All testimony shall be under oath and shall be recorded. The enforcement board shall take testimony from the code enforcement officer and alleged violator. Formal rules of evidence shall not apply, but fundamental due process shall be observed and shall govern the proceedings.

(d) At the conclusion of the hearing, the enforcement board shall issue findings of fact, based on evidence of record and conclusions of law, and shall issue an order affording the proper relief consistent with powers granted in this article. The findings and conclusions shall be by motion approved by a majority of those members present and voting, except that at least four members of a seven-member enforcement board, three members of a five-member enforcement board, or two members of a three-member enforcement board must vote in order for the action to be official. The order may include a notice that it must be complied with by a specified date and that a fine may be imposed if the order is not complied with by said date. A certified copy of such order may be recorded in the public records of the county and shall constitute notice to any subsequent purchasers, successors in interest, or assigns if the violation concerns real property, and the findings therein shall be binding upon the violator and, if the violation concerns real property, any subsequent purchasers, successors in interest, or assigns. If an order is recorded in the public records pursuant to this subsection and the order is complied with by the date specified in the order, the enforcement board shall issue an order acknowledging compliance that shall be recorded in the public records. A hearing is not required to issue such an order acknowledging compliance.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-24, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 163, § 3/HB 93.)

36-74-25. Powers of enforcement boards.

Statute text

Each enforcement board shall have the power to:

(1) Adopt rules for the conduct of its hearings, which rules shall, at a minimum, ensure that each side has an equal opportunity to present evidence and argument in support of its case;

(2) Subpoena alleged violators and witnesses to its hearings, with the approval of the court with jurisdiction over a criminal violator of the county or municipal code or ordinance. Subpoenas may be served by the sheriff, marshal, or police department of the county or by the police department of the municipality or by any other individual authorized by Code Section 24-13-24 to serve subpoenas;

(3) Subpoena evidence to its hearings in the same way as provided in paragraph (2) of this Code section, with the approval of the court with jurisdiction over a criminal violator of the county or municipal code or ordinance;

(4) Take testimony under oath; and

(5) Issue orders having the force of law to command whatever steps are necessary to bring a violation into compliance.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-74-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1102, § 3; Code 1981, § 36-74-25, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2003, p. 581, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 51/HB 24.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews. - For article, "Evidence," see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011). For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

36-74-26. Administrative fines; public record.

Statute text
